Tennessee, session 114, SB2367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-6-105, is amended by deleting the
language "and" after the semicolon in subdivision (3), and by adding the following new
subdivision (4) and redesignating the existing subdivision (4) accordingly:
(4) In any county having a population of not less than sixty thousand nine
hundred (60,900) and not more than sixty-one thousand (61,000), according to the 2020
federal census or a subsequent federal census; and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-30-103(4), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision (H):
(H) Any county having a population of not less than sixty thousand nine hundred
(60,900) and not more than sixty-one thousand (61,000), according to the 2020 federal
census or a subsequent federal census;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2367
012568
- 1 -